inc/flattened/verb_suffixes_flattened_abstract.lexc
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>a%>%>dwaa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg/Pl+ExclO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>siw%>%>aang #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>sigw4%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>isin%>%>oow%>%>egwaa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>isin%>%>o%>%>kwaa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+ExclO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>siw%>%>angi%>%>dwaa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+InclO:@D.Person@n%>%>isin%>%>ow%>%>ang%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>siw%>%>egw4 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>siw%>%>an #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>angi%>%>dwaa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>ang%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+MISSING:@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>a%>%>d%>%>y1%>ig #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+MISSING:@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>angi%>%>d%>%>y1%>ig #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+MISSING:@D.Person@n%>%>igo%>%>siw%>%>aany1%>in #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Pcp+Excl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>siw%>%>angi%>%>d%>%>y1%>ig #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>igo%>%>siw%>%>aamb1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0/3Obv+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>igo%>%>sigw4%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>isin%>%>oon%>%>agogo%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>isin%>%>oon%>%>aam%>b1aany1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>ag%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>siw%>%>ego%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>egw4%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>siw%>%>am%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>a%>%>dwaa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg/Pl+ExclO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>siw%>%>aangi%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>sigw4%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>isin%>%>oow%>%>egwaa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>isin%>%>o%>%>kwaa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+ExclO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>siw%>%>angi%>%>dwaa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+InclO:@D.Person@n%>%>isin%>%>ow%>%>ang%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>siw%>%>ego%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>siw%>%>am%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>angi%>%>dwaa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aa%>%>siw%>%>ang%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+MISSING:@D.Person@n%>%>igo%>%>siw%>%>aamb1an2ii%>in #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0+3SgProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>igo%>%>ogweny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>agogw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>aan2%>%>enh #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aaw%>%>ag%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>w%>%>egw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aaw%>%>egw4%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>w%>%>an%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aaw%>%>a%>%>dwaaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg/Pl+ExclO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>w%>%>aang%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>waag%>%>w4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>egw4%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>ik%>%>waa%>%>w%>%>enh #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+ExclO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>w%>%>angi%>%>dwaaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+InclO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>angw4%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>w%>%>egw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>w%>%>an%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aaw%>%>angi%>%>dwaaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aaw%>%>angw4%>%>waaw4%>%>eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+MISSING:@D.Person@n%>%>igo%>%>ogweny1%>in #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0+3SgProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>igo%>%>ogobaneny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>agogo%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>aam%>b1aan2%>%>enh #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aaw%>%>ag%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>w%>%>ego%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aaw%>%>egw4%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>w%>%>am%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aaw%>%>a%>%>dwaao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg/Pl+ExclO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>w%>%>aangi%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>waag%>%>o%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>egw4%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>ik%>%>waa%>b1an2%>%>enh #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+ExclO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>w%>%>angi%>%>dwaao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+InclO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>angw4%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>w%>%>ego%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>w%>%>am%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aaw%>%>angi%>%>dwaao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>aaw%>%>angw4%>%>waao%>b1an2eny1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+MISSING:@D.Person@n%>%>igo%>%>ogobaneny1%>in #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>ind%>%>waa%>%>o%>b1an2%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>ind%>%>waa%>%>w4%>en2 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>igo%>%>y%>%>aany1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>agogw4 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>aan2 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>agw4%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>y%>%>egw4 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>egw4%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>y%>%>an #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>a%>%>dwaa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg/Pl+ExclO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>y%>%>aang #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>waad1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>egw4%>%>waaw4 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>ik%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+ExclO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>y%>%>angi%>%>dwaa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+InclO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>angw4%>%>waaw4 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>y%>%>egw4 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>y%>%>an #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>angi%>%>dwaa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>ang%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+MISSING:@D.Person@n%>%>a%>%>d%>%>y1%>ig #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+MISSING:@D.Person@n%>%>angi%>%>d%>%>y1%>ig #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+MISSING:@D.Person@n%>%>igo%>%>y%>%>aany1%>in #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Pcp+Excl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>y%>%>angi%>%>d%>%>y1%>ig #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>igo%>%>y%>%>aambaany1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>agogo%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>aam%>b1aany1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>agw4%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>y%>%>ego%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>egw4%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>y%>%>am%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>a%>%>dwaa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg/Pl+ExclO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>y%>%>aangi%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>waap%>an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>egw4%>%>waao%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>ik%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+ExclO:@D.Person@n%>%>i2%>%>y%>%>angi%>%>dwaa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+InclO:@D.Person@n%>%>inin%>%>angw4%>%>waao%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2PlO:@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>y%>%>ego%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2SgO:@D.Person@n%>%>igoo%>%>y%>%>am%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>angi%>%>dwaa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@n%>%>ang%>%>waa%>b1an2i1 #;
@D.Person@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+MISSING:@D.Person@n%>%>igo%>%>y%>%>aambaany1%>%>ii%>in #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProxO:@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>ind%>%>waa%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@D.Mode.Dub@n%>%>indi%>b1an2%>%>i1 #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProxO:@D.Person@@D.Mode@n%>%>ind%>%>waa #;
@D.Person@@D.Mode@+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@D.Mode@n%>%>ind #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1SgO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>i2shikego #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1SgO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>i2shiken2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>aaken2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>aaken2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>aasiidaanig #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>aasiidaa #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Del+2Pl+1SgO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>i2shiikek #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Del+2Pl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@ni%>miinaakek #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Del+2Pl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>aakek #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Del+2Sg+1SgO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>i2shikan #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Del+2Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>aakan #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Del+2Sg+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>aakan #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>i2shik #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Imm+2Pl+3PlProxO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>i2k #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Imm+2Pl+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>i2k #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Imm+2Pl+ExclO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>i2shinaang #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>i2shin #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Imm+2Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>i2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Imm+2Sg+3PlProxO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>i2n #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Imm+2Sg+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>i2 #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Imm+2Sg+3SgProxO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>i2n #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Imm+2Sg+ExclO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@n%>%>i2shinaang #;
@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+Imm+Incl+3PlO:@D.Person@@D.Order.Cnj@ni%>miinaadaanik #;
